old/xu-hyphen/utf8-grmhyph4.tex
\message{UTF-8 hyphenation patterns for Modern Greek}
% This file was mechanically translated from a set of elhyphen patterns
% via "elhyph-utf8 -m" (version 0.2).
\begingroup
\lccode`'=`'\lccode`’=`’\lccode`ʼ=`ʼ\lccode`᾽=`᾽\lccode`᾿=`᾿
\patterns{%
%%%% double vowels (formerly called "diphthogs") and exceptions
α2ι 
α2ί α2ί α2ί 
% 'a3i --- not to be separated: ne-r'aida
α2υ 
α2ύ α2ύ α2ύ 
ά3υ ά3υ ά3υ 
ε2ι 
ε2ί ε2ί ε2ί 
% 'e3i --- not to be separated: to rw-m'ei-ko (one way to pronounce it)
ε2υ 
ε2ύ ε2ύ ε2ύ 
έ3υ έ3υ έ3υ 
η2υ 
η2ύ η2ύ η2ύ 
ή3υ ή3υ ή3υ 
ο2ι 
ο2ί ο2ί ο2ί 
% 'o3i --- not to be separated: to ko-r'oido
ο2υ 
ο2ύ ο2ύ ο2ύ 
ό3υ ό3υ ό3υ 
υ2ι 
υ2ί υ2ί υ2ί 
ύ3ι ύ3ι ύ3ι 
%%%% diphthogs: two vowels pronounced together in *one* syllable
%%%% (in some cases, the rules below will not allow the split up 
%%%% of syllables in words like: ka-ko-poi'oc, etc., but, better
%%%% this than gross mistakes like: qw-ri-'o)
α2η 
ά3η. ά3η. ά3η. 
α2ϊ α2ϊ 
ά3ι. ά3ι. ά3ι.   % ts'a-i 
α2ϋ α2ϋ   % ka"u-m'oc 
ε2ϊ ε2ϊ   % ze"i-mpekikoc 
ε2ϋ ε2ϋ   % Ke"u-l'anh 
ο2ει   % ap'oei-de 
ο2η   % b'oh-ja! 
ό3η. ό3η. ό3η.   % ql'o-h al'o-h 
ο2ϊ ο2ϊ 
ό3ι. ό3ι. ό3ι.   % s'o-i 
%%%%
ι2α 
ι2ά ι2ά ι2ά 
ι2ε 
ι2έ ι2έ ι2έ 
ι2ο 
ι2ό ι2ό ι2ό 
ο3ϊ3ό ο3ϊ3ό ο3ϊ3ό   % pro-"i-'on 
ι2ω 
ι2ώ ι2ώ ι2ώ 
.ι3 
ί3 ί3 ί3 
η2α 
η2ά η2ά η2ά 
η2ε 
η2έ η2έ η2έ 
η2ο 
η2ό η2ό η2ό 
η2ω 
η2ώ η2ώ η2ώ 
.η3 
ή3 ή3 ή3 
υ2α 
υ2ά υ2ά υ2ά 
υ2ο 
υ2ό υ2ό υ2ό 
υ2ω 
υ2ώ υ2ώ υ2ώ 
.υ3 
ύ3 ύ3 ύ3 
%%%% consonants at the end of words (including double consnants:
%%%% gk, mp, nt, tz, ts).
4β. 
4γ. 
4γκ. 
4δ. 
4ζ. 
4θ. 
4κ. 
4λ. 
4μ. 
4μπ. 
4ν. 
4ντ. 
4ξ. 
4π. 
4ρ. 
4σ. 4ϲ. 
4ς. 
4τ. 
4τζ. 
4τσ. 4τϲ. 
4τς. 
4φ. 
4χ. 
4ψ. 
%%%% right apostrophe and consonants with right apostrophe 
4' 4’ 4ʼ 4᾽ 4᾿ 
4β' 4β’ 4βʼ 4β᾽ 4β᾿ 
4γ' 4γ’ 4γʼ 4γ᾽ 4γ᾿ 
4γκ' 4γκ’ 4γκʼ 4γκ᾽ 4γκ᾿ 
4δ' 4δ’ 4δʼ 4δ᾽ 4δ᾿ 
4ζ' 4ζ’ 4ζʼ 4ζ᾽ 4ζ᾿ 
4θ' 4θ’ 4θʼ 4θ᾽ 4θ᾿ 
4κ' 4κ’ 4κʼ 4κ᾽ 4κ᾿ 
4λ' 4λ’ 4λʼ 4λ᾽ 4λ᾿ 
4μ' 4μ’ 4μʼ 4μ᾽ 4μ᾿ 
4μπ' 4μπ’ 4μπʼ 4μπ᾽ 4μπ᾿ 
4ν' 4ν’ 4νʼ 4ν᾽ 4ν᾿ 
4ντ' 4ντ’ 4ντʼ 4ντ᾽ 4ντ᾿ 
4ξ' 4ξ’ 4ξʼ 4ξ᾽ 4ξ᾿ 
4π' 4π’ 4πʼ 4π᾽ 4π᾿ 
4ρ' 4ρ’ 4ρʼ 4ρ᾽ 4ρ᾿ 
4σ' 4σ’ 4σʼ 4σ᾽ 4σ᾿ 4ϲ' 4ϲ’ 4ϲʼ 4ϲ᾽ 4ϲ᾿ 
4τ' 4τ’ 4τʼ 4τ᾽ 4τ᾿ 
4τζ' 4τζ’ 4τζʼ 4τζ᾽ 4τζ᾿ 
4τσ' 4τσ’ 4τσʼ 4τσ᾽ 4τσ᾿ 4τϲ' 4τϲ’ 4τϲʼ 4τϲ᾽ 4τϲ᾿ 
4φ' 4φ’ 4φʼ 4φ᾽ 4φ᾿ 
4χ' 4χ’ 4χʼ 4χ᾽ 4χ᾿ 
4ψ' 4ψ’ 4ψʼ 4ψ᾽ 4ψ᾿ 
%%%% consonants at the beggining of words
.β4 
.γ4 
.δ4 
.ζ4 
.θ4 
.κ4 
.λ4 
.μ4 
.ν4 
.ξ4 
.π4 
.ρ4 
.σ4 .ϲ4 
.τ4 
.φ4 
.χ4 
.ψ4 
%%%% separable double consonants
4β1β 
4γ1γ 
4δ1δ 
4ζ1ζ 
4θ1θ 
4κ1κ 
4λ1λ 
4μ1μ 
4ν1ν 
4π1π 
4ρ1ρ 
4σ1σ 4ϲ1ϲ 
4τ1τ 
4φ1φ 
4χ1χ 
4ψ1ψ 
%%%% other breakable consonant combinations
4β1ζ 
4β1θ 
4β1κ 
4β1μ 
4β1ν 
4β1ξ 
4β1π 
4β1σ 4β1ϲ 
4β1τ 
4β1φ 
4β1χ 
4β1ψ 
4γ1β 
4γ1ζ 
4γ1θ 
4γ1μ 
4ρ5γ2μ   % >'er-gma = 'ergo (arq.) 
4γ1ξ 
4γ1π 
4γ1σ 4γ1ϲ 
4γ1τ 
4γ1φ 
4γ1χ 
4γ1ψ 
4δ1β 
4δ1γ 
4δ1ζ 
4δ1θ 
4δ1κ 
4δ1λ 
% "dm" --- not separable: dm~hsic = exhm'erwma (arq.)
% "dn" --- not separable: dnofer'oc = zofer'oc, skotein'oc (arq.)
%                         Dne'iperoc = potam'oc thc Rws'iac
4δ1ξ 
4δ1π 
4δ1σ 4δ1ϲ 
4δ1τ 
4δ1φ 
4δ1χ 
4δ1ψ 
4ζ1β   % "zb" and "zg" appear in the beggining of Greek words (e.g., in 
4ζ1γ   % Andriotes' Lexicon), but they're usually written as "sb" and "sg". 
4ζ1δ 
4ζ1θ 
4ζ1κ 
4ζ1λ 
4ζ1μ 
τζ2μ   % m'ana-tzment (m'a-na-tzment) 
4ζ1ν 
4ζ1ξ 
4ζ1π 
4ζ1ρ 
4ζ1σ 4ζ1ϲ 
4ζ1τ 
4ζ1φ 
4ζ1χ 
4ζ1ψ 
4θ1β 
4θ1γ 
4θ1δ 
4θ1ζ 
4θ1κ 
4θ1μ 
4ρ5θ2μ   % por-jm'oc 
σθ2μ ϲθ2μ   % i-sjm'oc 
4θ1ξ 
4θ1π 
4θ1σ 4θ1ϲ 
4θ1τ 
4θ1φ 
4θ1χ 
4θ1ψ 
4κ1β   % "kb" may not be not separable: kb'anto kbantomhqanik'h 
4κ1γ 
4κ1δ 
4κ1ζ 
4κ1θ 
4κ1μ 
4λ5κ2μ   % Al-km'hnh 
4ρ5κ2μ   % dar-km'a = draqm'h (arq.) 
4κ1ξ 
4κ1π 
4κ1σ 4κ1ϲ 
4κ1φ 
4ν5κ2φ   % Fran-kfo'urth 
4κ1χ 
4κ1ψ 
4λ1β 
4λ1γ 
4λ1δ 
4λ1ζ 
4λ1θ 
4λ1κ 
4λ1μ 
4λ1ν 
4λ1ξ 
4λ1π 
4λ1ρ 
4λ1σ 4λ1ϲ 
4λ1τ 
4λ1φ 
4λ1χ 
4λ1ψ 
4μ1β 
4μ1γ 
4μ1δ 
4μ1ζ 
4μ1θ 
4μ1κ 
4μ1λ 
4μ1ξ 
4μ1ρ 
4μ1σ 4μ1ϲ 
4μ1τ 
4μ1φ 
4μ1χ 
4μ1ψ 
4ν1β 
4ν1γ 
4ν1δ 
4ν1ζ 
4ν1θ 
4ν1κ 
4ν1λ 
4ν1μ 
4ν1ξ 
4ν1π 
4ν1ρ 
4ν1σ 4ν1ϲ 
4ν1φ 
4ν1χ 
4ν1ψ 
4ξ1β 
4ξ1γ 
4ξ1δ 
4ξ1ζ 
4ξ1θ 
4ξ1κ 
4ξ1λ 
4ξ1μ 
4ξ1ν 
4ξ1π 
4ξ1ρ 
4ξ1σ 4ξ1ϲ 
4ξ1τ 
4γ5ξ2τ   % el'eg-xte 
4ρ5ξ2τ   % up'ar-xte 
4ξ1φ 
4ξ1χ 
4ξ1ψ 
4π1β 
4π1γ 
4π1δ 
4π1ζ 
4π1θ 
4π1κ 
4π1μ 
4π1ξ 
4π1σ 4π1ϲ 
4π1φ 
4π1χ 
4π1ψ 
4ρ1β 
4ρ1γ 
4ρ1δ 
4ρ1ζ 
4ρ1θ 
4ρ1κ 
4ρ1λ 
4ρ1μ 
4ρ1ν 
4ρ1ξ 
4ρ1π 
4ρ1σ 4ρ1ϲ 
4ρ1τ 
4ρ1φ 
4ρ1χ 
4ρ1ψ 
4σ1δ 4ϲ1δ   % "sd" may not be separable: sde'ugla = ze'ugla (arq.) 
4σ1ζ 4ϲ1ζ 
4σ1ν 4ϲ1ν   % "sn" may not be separable: sn'iqi (= sb'erkoc) snompism'oc 
4σ1ξ 4ϲ1ξ 
4σ1ρ 4ϲ1ρ 
4σ1ψ 4ϲ1ψ 
4τ1β 
4τ1γ 
4τ1δ 
4τ1θ 
4τ1κ 
% "tl" --- not separable: tlhmws'unh = miz'eria (arq.)
4τ1ν 
4τ1ξ 
4τ1π 
4τ1φ 
στ2φ ϲτ2φ   % fa-stfount'adiko Be-stfal'ia (German'ia) 
4τ1χ 
4τ1ψ 
4φ1β 
4φ1γ 
4φ1δ 
4φ1ζ 
4φ1κ   % "fk" may not be separable: fki'anw, fkias'idi 
4φ1μ 
4φ1ν 
4ρ5φ2ν   % or-fn'oc = skotein'oc (arq.) 
4φ1ξ 
4φ1π 
4φ1σ 4φ1ϲ 
4φ1χ 
4φ1ψ 
4χ1β 
4χ1γ 
4χ1δ 
4χ1ζ 
4χ1κ 
4χ1μ 
4ρ5χ2μ   % dar-qm'a = draqm'h (arq.) 
4χ1ξ 
4χ1π 
4χ1σ 4χ1ϲ 
4χ1φ 
4χ1ψ 
4ψ1β 
4ψ1γ 
4ψ1δ 
4ψ1ζ 
4ψ1θ 
4ψ1κ 
4ψ1λ 
4ψ1μ 
4ψ1ν 
4ψ1ξ 
4ψ1π 
4ψ1ρ 
4ψ1σ 4ψ1ϲ 
4ψ1τ 
4μ5ψ2τ   % l'am-yte 
4ψ1φ 
4ψ1χ 
%%%% some separable nasal consonant combinations
4γ5κ2φ   % Frag-kfo'urth 
4γ1κτ   % eleg-kt'hc 
4μ1πτ   % 'amem-ptoc 
4ν1τζ   % neran-tzi'a 
4ν1τσ 4ν1τϲ   % biolon-ts'elo 
%%%%
%%%% some `weird' terminations in words of Greek and non-Greek origin
%%%%
4βρ.   % or-nt'ebr 
4γλ.   % (od'oc Kar'olou) Ogl (B'oloc) 
4κλ.   % pi-n'akl 
4κτ.   % takt 
4γκς. 4γκϲ.   % mpagkc (mp'annu) 
4γκσ. 
4κς. 4κϲ.   % tankc 
4κσ. 
4λς. 4λϲ.   % balc 
4λσ. 
4μπλ.   % ntampl (pod'osfairo) 
4μπν.   % Impn (Sa"'int, arabik'o 'onoma) 
4μπρ.   % romp-nte-s'ampr 
4μς. 4μϲ.   % Tz'eimc 
4μσ. 
4νς. 4νϲ.   % 'el-minc ('el-min-joc) tranc 
4νσ. 
4ρς. 4ρϲ.   % (empr'oc) marc 
4ρσ. 
4σκ. 4ϲκ.   % Noboros'isk (p'olh thc Rws'iac) 
4στ. 4ϲτ.   % karst trast 
4τλ.   % Si'atl (p'olh twn HPA) 
4τρ.   % maitr 
4ντς. 4ντϲ.   % (frou'it) pantc Frantc 
4ντσ. 
4φτ.   % kriskr'aft 
4χτ.   % B'ermaqt (Germanik'oc Strat'oc) 
%%%%
%%%% some `weird' double-consonant combinations that may occur in 
%%%% words of non-greek origin like "romp-nte-s'ampr" (= robe de
%%%% chambre)
%%%%
4γκ1μπ 
4γκ1ντ 
4γκ1τζ 
4γκ1τσ 4γκ1τϲ 
4μπ1ντ 
4μπ1τζ 
4μπ1τσ 4μπ1τϲ 
4ντ1μπ 
4τσ1γκ 4τϲ1γκ 
4τσ1μπ 4τϲ1μπ 
4τσ1ντ 4τϲ1ντ 
%-- Vowel patterns
α1 ε1 η1 ι1 ο1 υ1 ω1 ϊ1 ϋ1 ά1 έ1 ό1 ώ1 ΐ1 ΰ1 α2́1 α2̀1 α2͂1 α2̓1 α2̓́1 α2̓̀1 α2̓͂1 α2̔1 α2̔́1 α2̔̀1 α2̔͂1 α2ͅ1 α2́ͅ1 α2̀ͅ1 α2͂ͅ1 α2̓ͅ1 α2̓́ͅ1 α2̓̀ͅ1 α2̓͂ͅ1 α2̔ͅ1 α2̔́ͅ1 α2̔̀ͅ1 α2̔͂ͅ1 α2̈1 α2̈́1 α2̈̀1 α2̈͂1 ε2́1 ε2̀1 ε2͂1 ε2̓1 ε2̓́1 ε2̓̀1 ε2̓͂1 ε2̔1 ε2̔́1 ε2̔̀1 ε2̔͂1 ε2ͅ1 ε2́ͅ1 ε2̀ͅ1 ε2͂ͅ1 ε2̓ͅ1 ε2̓́ͅ1 ε2̓̀ͅ1 ε2̓͂ͅ1 ε2̔ͅ1 ε2̔́ͅ1 ε2̔̀ͅ1 ε2̔͂ͅ1 ε2̈1 ε2̈́1 ε2̈̀1 ε2̈͂1 η2̀1 η2͂1 η2̓1 η2̓́1 η2̓̀1 η2̓͂1 η2̔1 η2̔́1 η2̔̀1 η2̔͂1 η2ͅ1 η2́ͅ1 η2̀ͅ1 η2͂ͅ1 η2̓ͅ1 η2̓́ͅ1 η2̓̀ͅ1 η2̓͂ͅ1 η2̔ͅ1 η2̔́ͅ1 η2̔̀ͅ1 η2̔͂ͅ1 η2̈1 η2̈́1 η2̈̀1 η2̈͂1 ι2̀1 ι2͂1 ι2̓1 ι2̓́1 ι2̓̀1 ι2̓͂1 ι2̔1 ι2̔́1 ι2̔̀1 ι2̔͂1 ι2ͅ1 ι2́ͅ1 ι2̀ͅ1 ι2͂ͅ1 ι2̓ͅ1 ι2̓́ͅ1 ι2̓̀ͅ1 ι2̓͂ͅ1 ι2̔ͅ1 ι2̔́ͅ1 ι2̔̀ͅ1 ι2̔͂ͅ1 ι2̈1 ι2̈́1 ι2̈̀1 ι2̈͂1 ο2́1 ο2̀1 ο2͂1 ο2̓1 ο2̓́1 ο2̓̀1 ο2̓͂1 ο2̔1 ο2̔́1 ο2̔̀1 ο2̔͂1 ο2ͅ1 ο2́ͅ1 ο2̀ͅ1 ο2͂ͅ1 ο2̓ͅ1 ο2̓́ͅ1 ο2̓̀ͅ1 ο2̓͂ͅ1 ο2̔ͅ1 ο2̔́ͅ1 ο2̔̀ͅ1 ο2̔͂ͅ1 ο2̈1 ο2̈́1 ο2̈̀1 ο2̈͂1 υ2̀1 υ2͂1 υ2̓1 υ2̓́1 υ2̓̀1 υ2̓͂1 υ2̔1 υ2̔́1 υ2̔̀1 υ2̔͂1 υ2ͅ1 υ2́ͅ1 υ2̀ͅ1 υ2͂ͅ1 υ2̓ͅ1 υ2̓́ͅ1 υ2̓̀ͅ1 υ2̓͂ͅ1 υ2̔ͅ1 υ2̔́ͅ1 υ2̔̀ͅ1 υ2̔͂ͅ1 υ2̈1 υ2̈́1 υ2̈̀1 υ2̈͂1 ω2́1 ω2̀1 ω2͂1 ω2̓1 ω2̓́1 ω2̓̀1 ω2̓͂1 ω2̔1 ω2̔́1 ω2̔̀1 ω2̔͂1 ω2ͅ1 ω2́ͅ1 ω2̀ͅ1 ω2͂ͅ1 ω2̓ͅ1 ω2̓́ͅ1 ω2̓̀ͅ1 ω2̓͂ͅ1 ω2̔ͅ1 ω2̔́ͅ1 ω2̔̀ͅ1 ω2̔͂ͅ1 ω2̈1 ω2̈́1 ω2̈̀1 ω2̈͂1 
}
\endgroup
\endinput
